Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to  the Employment Relations Board, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $4,123,111.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $371,530
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds and funds described in section 3 of this 2025 Act,
collected or received by the Employment Relations Board.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,884,766 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from moneys received from the assessment against state  agencies de-
scribed in ORS  240.167 and transferred to the Employment Relations Board Administrative
Account.
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5008 (HB 5008-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5008 (HB 5008-A) Page 2